Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.620

List of contacts—Health care professions.

The secretary shall create and maintain a list of contacts with each of the health care professions regulated under the following chapters for the purpose of policy advice and information dissemination: RCW 18.06.080, 18.89.050, and 18.138.070 and chapters *18.135, 18.55, and 18.88A RCW.

[ 1999 c 151 s 402.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 18.135 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 153 s 20.

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.